Colorado statutes. TITLE 19 Children's Code
SUBPART A
IN GENERAL

19-2.5-1401. Responsible agencies.

The department of human services is the single state agency responsible for the oversight of the administration of juvenile programs and the delivery of services for juveniles and their families in this state. In addition, the department of human services
is responsible for juvenile parole. The state judicial department is responsible for the oversight of juvenile probation. The department of public safety is responsible for the oversight of community diversion programs and programs
funded through the allocation authorized in section 19-2.5-402 (2). The state agencies described in this section shall jointly oversee the application by judicial districts of the placement criteria established by the working group
pursuant to section 19-2.5-1404.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire section amended, (SB 21-066), ch. 64, p. 254, § 1, effective April 29; entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 675, § 2, effective October 1.

19-2.5-1402. Juvenile community review board.

A board of county commissioners or the city council of the city and county of Denver or more than one board of county commissioners may adopt a written resolution requiring approval by a juvenile community review board of residential community placements
within its county of juveniles under commitment to the department of human services. Upon the effective date of such resolution and notice to the department of human services, a juvenile committed to the custody of the department
of human services shall not be placed into a residential community placement in that county or region unless and until the placement is approved by the juvenile community review board.

A juvenile community review board may be consolidated with other local advisory boards pursuant to section 24-1.7-103.

Notification of any placement of a juvenile under the jurisdiction of the juvenile parole board must be made to the juvenile community review board prior to or at the time of placement.

Prior to placement of a juvenile in a residential community placement, the juvenile community review board shall review the juvenile's case file. It is the responsibility of the department of human services to provide accurate information regarding the
juvenile and the proposed placement to the juvenile community review board. The information must include, but not be limited to, a history of delinquent adjudications, a social history, an educational history, a mental
health treatment history, a drug and alcohol treatment history, and a summary of institutional progress. Each juvenile case referred to the board must be reviewed within fourteen days from the date the referral is received.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (4)(b) is effective until December 31, 2022.] The board shall review the juvenile's case file and make a decision regarding residential community placement, taking into consideration the results of a validated
risk and needs assessment adopted pursuant to section 24-33.5-2402 (1) by the department of human services, the criteria established by the juvenile community review board based on the interests of the community, and
guidance established by the department of human services in consultation with the juvenile justice reform committee established pursuant to section 24-33.5-2401. The criteria must be based upon researched factors that
have been demonstrated to be correlative to risk to the community.

(b)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (4)(b) is effective December 31, 2022.

]
The board shall review the juvenile's case file and make a decision regarding residential community placement, taking into consideration the results of a validated risk and needs assessment adopted
pursuant to section 24-33.5-2402 (1), as it existed prior to its repeal in 2022, by the department of human services, the criteria established by the juvenile community review board based on the interests of the
community, and guidance established by the department of human services in consultation with the committee on juvenile justice reform established pursuant to section 24-33.5-2401, as it existed prior to its repeal
in 2022. The criteria must be based upon researched factors that have been demonstrated to be correlative to risk to the community.

All names, addresses, and information regarding a juvenile case reviewed by the juvenile community review board are confidential and not disclosed except to the board or its designees, the Colorado bureau of investigation, and any law enforcement agency,
without express written permission of the juvenile and the legal custodian.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 675, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2022:
(4)(b) amended, (HB 22-1211), ch. 79, p. 395, § 10, effective December 31.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-210 as it existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-1403. Division of youth services - community boards.

There is created in each region of the division of youth services a community board to:

Promote transparency and community involvement in division of youth services' facilities within the region;

Provide opportunities for youth to build positive relationships with adult role models; and

Promote youth involvement in the community.

Each community board must include six members with a diverse array of experience and perspectives related to incarcerated youth. Each member of each board must be a resident of, or work within, the region in which the member serves.

The governor or the governor's designee shall appoint each member of each board to a term of three years, and each member may serve an unlimited number of terms. Members serve without compensation.

A member of a community board may not be employed by the department of human services or the division of youth services.

Each community board shall elect a chair and a vice-chair from among its members.

Each community board shall meet at least once every three months. The chair of each community board may call such additional meetings as are necessary for the community board to accomplish its duties.

Leadership and staff members of the department of human services and the division of youth services, as well as representatives of an organization in Colorado that exists for the purpose of dealing with the state as an employer concerning issues of mutual
concern between employees and the state, are invited to attend community board meetings to provide their perspectives.

A management-level employee of each facility in each region shall attend each meeting of their regional community board. At least once every three months, a representative of the division of youth services shall update the community board regarding new
policies, practices, and programs affecting the region and any issues of concern in the region during the past quarter.

The division of youth services shall allow board members to have periodic access to enter facilities in their regions on at least a quarterly basis and speak with youth and staff, unless an emergency prevents such access.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 676, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-203.5 as it existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-1404. Working group for criteria for placement of juvenile offenders - establishment of formula - review of criteria - report.

The executive director of the department of human services and the state court administrator of the judicial department, or any designees of such persons, shall form a working group that includes representatives from:

The division of criminal justice of the department of public safety;

The office of state planning and budgeting;

The Colorado district attorneys' council;

Law enforcement, including at least one representative from a statewide organization of county sheriffs;

The public defender's office and the office of alternate defense counsel;

The office of the child representative;

Juvenile probation;

Juvenile court judges and magistrates;

Local and county governments, including at least three representatives from county departments of human or social services;

The division of youth services;

The division of child welfare;

The local juvenile services planning committees, created in section 19-2.5-302; and

Organizations that advocate for youth involved in the juvenile justice system.

The working group must also include at least two persons directly affected by the incarceration of youth, of whom, at least one person who is or was a youth in the custody of a division of youth services facility.

The working group shall carry out the following duties:

To establish a set of criteria for both detention and commitment for the purposes of determining which juvenile offenders are appropriate for placement in the physical or legal custody of the department of human services. The criteria must conform with
section 19-2.5-305. This set of criteria, when adopted by the department of human services and the judicial department, must promote a more uniform system of determining which juveniles should be placed in the
physical custody of the department of human services or in the legal custody of the department of human services so that decisions for placement of a juvenile are made based upon a uniform set of criteria throughout
the state. In addition, the criteria must specifically take into account the juvenile's educational needs and ensure the juvenile's access to appropriate educational services. The working group established pursuant
to this subsection (1) shall hold a meeting at least four times each year and as necessary to review and propose revision to the criteria established pursuant to this subsection (1) and the formula created pursuant
to subsection (1)(b)(V) of this section.

Before January 1, 2021, to develop or adopt by a majority vote of the working group a research-based detention screening instrument to be used statewide to inform placement of juveniles in a detention facility. In developing or adopting the detention
screening instrument, the working group shall consult with expert organizations and review research and best practices from other jurisdictions. The working group is also responsible for:

Ensuring that the instrument identifies and mitigates any disparate impacts based on disability, race or ethnicity, gender, sexual orientation, national origin, economic status, or child welfare involvement;

Identifying measures and scoring for the detention screening instrument to determine eligibility for placement in a juvenile detention facility;

Identifying how the instrument is validated and piloted; and

Establishing statewide scoring override policies that minimize subjective decisions to hold a juvenile in a detention facility, while allowing for local flexibility;

Before January 1, 2021, to develop a plan to provide training and technical assistance to screening teams on the implementation of the detention screening instrument, including at least annual refresher training;

Before January 1, 2021, to develop a plan for the division of youth services to collect, compile, and report to the judiciary committees of the senate and the house of representatives, the health and human services committee of the senate, and the public
health care and human services committee of the house of representatives, or any successor committees, annually on the use of secure detention; number and justification of overrides of the detention screening
instrument as conducted pursuant to section 19-2.5-303; and, if possible, an analysis of detention screening instrument data to determine if any disparate impacts resulted based on race, ethnicity, gender, sexual
orientation, national origin, economic status, or child welfare involvement. The division of youth services shall recommend any necessary changes to appropriations that need to be made prior to fully implementing
this section's recommendations. Notwithstanding section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), this reporting requirement continues indefinitely.

To establish a formula for the purpose of allocating funds by each judicial district in the state of Colorado for alternative services to placing juveniles in the physical custody of the department of human services or in the legal custody of the department
of human services. The allocation must take into consideration such factors as the population of the judicial district, the incidence of offenses committed by juveniles in such judicial district, and other factors
as deemed appropriate. The working group shall consider and take into account whether any federal money or matching funds are available to cover the costs of juveniles within the system, including parent fees
and third-party reimbursement as authorized by law or reimbursements under Title IV-E of the federal "Social Security Act", as amended.

Before January 1, 2021, to establish criteria for juveniles served through alternative services funded pursuant to subsection (1)(b)(V) of this section. The criteria must prioritize:

Preadjudicated juveniles eligible for placement in a detention facility as determined by results from a detention screening instrument;

Juveniles who are in secure detention; and

Juveniles under the supervision of probation when the results of a detention screening instrument indicate that the juvenile is eligible for detention.

At least every two years, to review data collected by the division of youth services on the use of funding pursuant to subsection (1)(b)(V) of this section and its impact on the use of juvenile detention. The working group shall identify the measures
that it will collect as part of its review of the impact of preadjudicated funding on detention pursuant to this section.

Before January 1, 2021, to adopt a relative information form concerning a juvenile's potential need for services or placement. The information form must be available at each judicial district to each parent or legal guardian of a juvenile screened for
detention and participation in alternative services. The information form must:

Advise the parent or legal guardian that he or she is required to provide the requested information fully and completely; and

Require the parent or legal guardian to list the names, addresses, e-mail addresses, and telephone numbers of every grandparent, relative, kin, and person with a significant relationship with the juvenile and any comments concerning the appropriateness
of the juvenile's potential need for services from or placement with those persons.

Before January 1, 2021, to develop a system of graduated responses and rewards to guide parole officers in determining how best to motivate positive juvenile behavior change and the appropriate response to a violation of terms and conditions of juvenile
parole. Graduated responses means an accountability-based series of sanctions and services designed to respond to a juvenile's violation of parole quickly, consistently, and proportionally and incentives to
motivate positive behavior change and successful completion of parole and the juvenile's reentry and treatment goals.

Before July 1, 2022, to create a formula for the allocation of money to judicial districts pursuant to section 19-2.5-1407 (3) for the provision of temporary shelter for juveniles.

Of the members of the working group established pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the executive director of the department of human services and the state court administrator of the judicial department, or any designees of such persons, have
final authority to carry out the duty of creating the set of criteria pursuant to subsections (1)(b)(I) to (1)(b)(IV) of this section and creating the formula pursuant to subsections (1)(b)(V) to (1)(b)(VII) of this section.
This authority can only be exercised after working with and participating in the working group process established in this section.

On or before October 31, 2021, and at least four times each year thereafter and as necessary to perform the duties described in this subsection (3), the working group shall convene for the purpose of examining the availability of alternatives to youth
detention and the use of detention beds, and examining necessary investments in alternatives to youth detention, including less restrictive placements that serve alleged and adjudicated juvenile offenders and community-based
services that allow alleged and adjudicated juvenile offenders to live with family or kin. The working group shall carry out the following duties:

(I) By October 31, 2022, the working group shall develop performance standards and outcome measures to evaluate the degree to which alleged and adjudicated offenders are in the least restrictive setting with appropriate services. The performance standards
and outcome measures must:

Evaluate whether the number of alternative placements, range of services offered by such placements, and community-based services available meet the needs of youth in each judicial district and county; and

Determine whether and how specific data and outcome measures must be reported to evaluate the efficacy of less restrictive placements and community-based services.

(II) The working group shall advise the department of human services concerning policies, procedures, and best practices related to serving youth in the least restrictive setting.

(III) The working group shall review the data provided by the department of human services pursuant to subsection (3)(b) of this section, and provide recommendations:

(A) To enhance the continuum of community-based services and placement options for alleged and adjudicated juvenile offenders, including recommendations to improve availability and quality of less restrictive alternative placements and community-based
services for youth;

(B) Regarding any changes to secure detention bed capacity limits and the allocation of detention beds across the state; and

For future data collection and reporting to assist the working group in completing its duties.

On or before July 1, 2023, and on or before July 1 each year thereafter, the department of human services shall submit a report to the working group, the judiciary committees of the senate and the house of representatives, or any successor committees,
and the health and human services committee of the senate and the public and behavioral health and human services committee of the house of representatives, or any successor committees, including:

An analysis of the data collected in accordance with the performance standards and outcome measures developed pursuant to subsection (3)(a)(I) of this section, and an analysis of the progress toward meeting the performance standards and outcome measures
developed pursuant to subsection (3)(a)(I) of this section;

The status of implementation of efforts guided by the working group's recommendations pursuant to subsection (3)(a)(II) of this section;

An analysis of the continuum of in-home and out-of- home placement options and supports for alleged juvenile offenders, including the current availability capacities of the options and supports, including:

An analysis of the availability of and demand for less restrictive alternative placements in each judicial district and county, including but not limited to residential treatment facilities, qualified residential treatment programs, nonqualified residential
treatment programs, residential community placements, shelter placements, and family-type settings, including but not limited to foster care;

An analysis of the availability and use of funding for less restrictive alternative placements in each judicial district and county, including but not limited to residential treatment facilities, qualified residential treatment programs, nonqualified
residential treatment programs, residential community placements, shelter placements, and family-type settings, including but not limited to foster care;

An analysis of the availability of and demand for community-based services in each judicial district and county offered to alleged and adjudicated juvenile offenders that assist in allowing children to live with family or kin, including the types of community-based
services available and capacity for each type of service in each judicial district and county; and

An analysis of the availability and use of funding for community-based services in each judicial district and county offered to alleged and adjudicated juvenile offenders, including the amount of funding spent on different types of services.

An analysis of barriers to placing youth in less restrictive alternative placements;

The number of youth in detention awaiting placement in a less restrictive community setting;

The number of youth in detention charged by direct filing pursuant to section 19-2.5-801 by judicial district or county, and the average length of stay in detention for these youth;

An analysis of the number of youth placed in less restrictive alternative placements, including but not limited to residential treatment facilities, qualified residential treatment programs, nonqualified residential treatment programs, residential community
placements, shelter placements, and family-type settings, including but not limited to foster care, and the length of stay in these placements for alleged and adjudicated offenders;

An analysis of the involvement of youth and their families, and their satisfaction with less restrictive alternative placements;

An analysis of the number of alleged and adjudicated juvenile offenders who are served by county human services departments through their child welfare systems and the impact on those county departments; and

The recommendations of the working group made pursuant to subsection (3)(a)(III) of this section.

Notwithstanding section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), the report required in subsection (3)(b) of this section continues indefinitely.

Source:

L. 2021:
IP(1)(a), (1)(a)(IV), (1)(a)(VIII), (1)(a)(IX), and (1)(b)(I) amended and (1)(a)(X), (1)(a)(XI), (1)(a)(XII), (1)(a)(XIII), (1)(a.5), and (3) added, (SB 21-071), ch. 463, p. 3336, § 7, effective July 6; entire article
added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 677, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2022:
(1)(b)(X) added, (HB 22-1056), ch. 383, p. 2740, § 2, effective June 7.

19-2.5-1405. Working group - allocation of beds.

The executive director of the department of human services and the state court administrator in the judicial department, or a designee of such persons, in consultation with the division of criminal justice of the department of public safety, the office
of state planning and budgeting, the Colorado district attorneys' council, and law enforcement representatives, shall form a working group that has the following duties:

To annually allocate the number of juvenile detention beds to each catchment area in the state created pursuant to section 19-2.5-1513, based on the number of juvenile beds established pursuant to section 19-2.5-1514. Once the allocation of juvenile detention
beds is made to the catchment areas, the working group shall allocate detention beds within the catchment areas to the judicial districts within each catchment area. Judicial districts shall not exceed the number of
beds allocated to them except for circumstances provided for in subsection (1)(b) of this section.

To develop a mechanism for judicial districts to loan detention beds to other judicial districts in cases of need;

To develop emergency release guidelines that must be used by each judicial district to prevent placement of a juvenile in a juvenile detention facility in excess of the number of beds allocated to the judicial district; and

To develop juvenile detention placement guidelines for each judicial district to use in complying with the number of juvenile detention beds allocated to the judicial district.

Source:

L. 2021:
IP(1) and (1)(b) amended, (SB 21-071), ch. 463, p. 3335, § 5, effective July 6; entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 680, § 2, effective October 1.

19-2.5-1406. Juvenile probation departments or divisions - service agreements.

The juvenile court is authorized to establish juvenile probation departments or divisions.

Subject to section 13-3-105, the juvenile court is authorized to appoint juvenile probation officers and such other professional and clerical personnel as may be required. Juvenile probation officers have the powers and duties specified in section 19-2.5-1107
and have the powers of peace officers, as described in sections 16-2.5-101 and 16-2.5-138.

Upon the agreement of the juvenile court judges, the approval of the chief judge in each district or, for the second judicial district, the presiding judge of the Denver juvenile court, and the approval of the chief justice of the supreme court, two or
more contiguous judicial districts may combine to form an interdistrict juvenile probation department.

The juvenile court judges are authorized to enter into agreements with the state department of human services, county departments of human or social services, other public agencies, private agencies, or with other juvenile courts to provide supervision
or other services for juveniles placed on probation by the court.

The conditions and terms of any such agreement must be set forth in writing, including any payments to be made by the court for the services provided.

Any agreement made pursuant to this subsection (4) may be terminated with ninety-one days written notice by either party.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 681, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-204 as it existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-1407. Appropriations to department of human services for services to juveniles - definition - repeal.

The general assembly shall appropriate money for the provision of services to juveniles to the department of human services. The department of human services shall allocate such money by each judicial district in the state. The appropriation and allocation
must be made based upon the formula developed pursuant to section 19-2.5-1404 (1)(b)(V). The department of human services shall administer the appropriated money. The money appropriated to the department of human services for
allocation by each judicial district must be expended in the judicial district by the department of human services for services to juveniles that are intended to prevent the juvenile from being held in detention prior to adjudication,
including implementing options provided in the screening instrument described in section 19-2.5-1404; sentenced to detention; or committed to the department of human services or to reduce the length of time the juvenile is
held in preadjudication or postadjudication detention or held in a commitment facility operated pursuant to section 19-2.5-1502. If a judicial district has a local juvenile services planning committee, the expenditure of money
for juvenile services in the judicial district must be made in accordance with the plan developed pursuant to section 19-2.5-302.

For the purposes of this section, a "juvenile" also includes a youth ten years of age or older but less than seventeen years of age who is habitually truant, as defined in section 22-33-102 (3.5), and who the court has ordered to show cause why the juvenile
should not be held in contempt of court pursuant to section 22-33-108 (7), when funds are expended for services that are intended to prevent the youth from being held in detention or sentenced to detention.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate money to the department of human services for the provision of temporary shelter for juveniles by judicial districts. The general assembly shall appropriate an amount sufficient to fund five nights of care
for each juvenile who, based on the results of a screening by the judicial district's screening team, is screened to temporary care in a licensed temporary shelter facility.

On or before November 1, 2022, and annually thereafter, the department shall allocate money to judicial districts in accordance with the formula developed pursuant to section 19-2.5-1404 (1)(b)(X).

In order to receive an allocation for state fiscal year 2022-23, a judicial district's juvenile services planning committee, or the judicial district if the judicial district has not established a juvenile services planning committee, shall submit a plan
to the department no later than September 1, 2022, that details how the judicial district will provide temporary shelter in the district during state fiscal year 2022-23. The plan must include that placement
in licensed shelter care is voluntary and must not exceed five days. (c) (I) (A) In order to receive an allocation for state fiscal year 2022-23, a judicial district's juvenile services planning committee,
or the judicial district if the judicial district has not established a juvenile services planning committee, shall submit a plan to the department no later than September 1, 2022, that details how the
judicial district will provide temporary shelter in the district during state fiscal year 2022-23. The plan must include that placement in licensed shelter care is voluntary and must not exceed five
days.

This subsection (3)(c)(I) is repealed, effective July 1, 2023.

For state fiscal year 2023-24 and each year thereafter, in order to receive an allocation, a juvenile services planning committee, or the judicial district if the judicial district has not established a juvenile services planning committee, shall include
in its plan developed pursuant to section 19-2.5-302 a plan for providing temporary shelter in the judicial district. The plan must include that placement in licensed shelter care is voluntary and must not exceed
five days.

A judicial district's juvenile services planning committee, or the judicial district, may use money allocated pursuant to this subsection (3) for:

The cost of care in a licensed temporary shelter, including any transportation costs, for up to five nights for each juvenile who, after screening by the judicial district's screening team, is referred to receive temporary care in a licensed temporary
shelter facility;

Providing support to a grandparent, kin, or other suitable person for care of a juvenile released to the person's care while emergency circumstances exist, as determined by the judicial district's juvenile services planning committee that prevent the
juvenile from returning home. Support provided to a grandparent, kin, or other suitable person must be based on the actual costs incurred by the person for caring for the juvenile.

Services for and evaluation of a juvenile receiving temporary shelter; and

Establishing licensed temporary shelter through evaluation or recruitment and providing training needed to operate temporary shelter.

On or before January 31, 2024, and on or before January 31 of each year thereafter, the house of representatives public and behavioral health and human services committee and the senate health and human services committee, or their successor committees,
shall hold a joint hearing to determine whether the recommendations of the working group described in section 19-2.5-1404 have been implemented in a manner that warrants the repeal of this subsection (3) prior
to its scheduled repeal in 2026. At the hearing that occurs during the 2026 regular legislative session, the committees shall consider whether this subsection (3) should be continued.

At the hearing, the department shall present on its most recent report issued pursuant to section 19-2.5-1404 (3)(b), the committees shall permit representatives of the working group to testify or provide information to the committees, and the committees
shall take public testimony regarding implementation of the working group's recommendations.

This subsection (3) is repealed, effective June 30, 2026.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 681, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2022:
(1) amended and (3) added, (HB 22-1056), ch. 383, p. 2738, § 1, effective June 7.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-310 as it existed prior to 2021.